en: Lens color combination: Amber/Blue; Blue; Cyan; Green; Magenta/Green; Red/Blue; Red/Cyan; Red/Green; Other
ro-RO: Combinație de culori lentile: Chihlimbar/albastru; Albastru; Cyan; Verde; Magenta/verde; Roșu/albastru; Roșu/cyan; Roșu/verde; Altele
lt-LT: Lęšių spalvų derinys: Gintarinė/mėlyna; Mėlyna; Žydra; Žalia; Purpurinė/žalia; Raudona/mėlyna; Raudona/žydra; Raudona/žalia; Kita
es: Combinación de colores de lentes: Ámbar/Azul; Azul; Cian; Verde; Magenta/Verde; Rojo/Azul; Rojo/Cian; Rojo/Verde; Otros
ko: 렌즈 색상 조합: 앰버/블루; 블루; 청록색; 녹색; 마젠타/그린; 레드/블루; 레드/시안; 레드/그린; 기타
bg-BG: Цветова комбинация на лещите: Кехлибар/син; Синьо; Циан; Зелен; Магента/зелен; Червен/син; Червен/циан; Червен/зелен; Други
fi: Linssien väriyhdistelmä: Meripihka/sininen; Sininen; Syaani; Vihreä; Magenta/vihreä; Punainen/sininen; Punainen/syaani; Punainen/vihreä; Muu
sl-SI: Kombinacija barve leč: Jantarno/modro; Moder; Sinja; Zeleno; Magenta/zeleno; Rdeče/modro; Rdeče/cijan; Rdeče/zeleno; Drugo
da: Linsefarvekombination: Rav/blå; Blå; Cyan; Grøn; Magenta/grøn; Rød/blå; Rød/cyan; Rød/grøn; Andet
tr: Lens renk kombinasyonu: Kehribar/Mavi; Mavi; Camgöbeği; Yeşil; Macenta/Yeşil; Kırmızı/Mavi; Kırmızı/Camgöbeği; Kırmızı/Yeşil; Diğer
sk-SK: Farebná kombinácia šošoviek: Jantárová/modrá; Modrý; Azúrový; Zelený; Purpurová/zelená; Červená/modrá; Červená/azúrová; Červená/zelená; Iné
it: Combinazione colore lenti: Ambra/blu; Blu; Ciano; Verde; Magenta/verde; Rosso/blu; Rosso/ciano; Rosso/verde; Altro
th: การผสมสีเลนส์: อำพัน/น้ำเงิน; น้ำเงิน; สีฟ้าอมเขียว; สีเขียว; ม่วงแดง/เขียว; แดง/น้ำเงิน; แดง/ฟ้าอมเขียว; แดง/เขียว; อื่นๆ
sv: Linsens färgkombination: Gul/blå; Blå; Cyan; Grön; Magenta/grön; Röd/blå; Röd/cyan; Röd/grön; Övrigt
nb: Linsefargekombinasjon: Rav/blå; Blå; Cyan; Grønn; Magenta/grønn; Rød/blå; Rød/cyan; Rød/grønn; Annet
zh-CN: 镜片颜色组合: 琥珀色/蓝色; 蓝色; 青色; 青香型; 品红色/绿色; 红色/蓝色; 红色/青色; 红色/绿色; 其他
pt-PT: Combinação de cores das lentes: Âmbar/azul; Azul; Ciano; Verde; Magenta/verde; Vermelho/azul; Vermelho/ciano; Vermelho/verde; Outro
ja: レンズカラーコンビネーション: アンバー/ブルー; ブルー; シアン; グリーン; マゼンタ/グリーン; レッド/ブルー; レッド/シアン; レッド/グリーン; その他
hr-HR: Kombinacija boja leća: Jantarna/plava; Plava; Cijan; Zelena; Magenta/zelena; Crvena/plava; Crvena/cijan; Crvena/zelena; Ostalo
hu: Lencse-színkombináció: Borostyán/kék; Kék; Cián; Zöld; Magenta/zöld; Piros/kék; Piros/ciánkék; Piros/zöld; Egyéb
nl: Lens kleurencombinatie: Amber/blauw; Blauw; Cyaan; Groen; Magenta/groen; Rood/blauw; Rood/cyaan; Rood/groen; Andere
de: Linsen-Farbkombination: Bernstein/Blau; Blau; Cyan; Grün; Magenta/Grün; Rot/Blau; Rot/Cyan; Rot/Grün; Sonstiges
ru: Цветовая комбинация линз: Янтарный/синий; Синий; Голубой; Зеленый; Пурпурный/зелёный; Красный/синий; Красный/голубой; Красный/зелёный; Другой
zh-TW: 鏡片色彩組合: 琥珀色/藍色; 藍色; 青色; 綠色調; 洋紅色/綠色; 紅色/藍色; 紅色/青色; 紅色/綠色; 其他
fr: Combinaison de couleurs des verres: Ambre/bleu; Bleu; Cyan; Vert; Magenta/vert; Rouge/bleu; Rouge/cyan; Rouge/vert; Autre
pl: Kombinacja kolorów soczewek: Bursztynowy/niebieski; Niebieski; Cyjan; Zielony; Magenta/zielony; Czerwony/niebieski; Czerwony/cyjan; Czerwony/zielony; Inne
el: Συνδυασμός χρώματος φακών: Κεχριμπάρι/Μπλε; Μπλε; Κυανό; Πράσινο; Ματζέντα/Πράσινο; Κόκκινο/Μπλε; Κόκκινο/Κυανό; Κόκκινο/Πράσινο; Άλλο
cs: Barevná kombinace čoček: Jantarová/modrá; Modrá; Tyrkysová; Zelená; Purpurová/zelená; Červená/modrá; Červená/azurová; Červená/zelená; Jiné
pt-BR: Combinação de cores das lentes: Âmbar/azul; Azul; Ciano; Verde; Magenta/verde; Vermelho/azul; Vermelho/ciano; Vermelho/verde; Outro
vi: Kết hợp màu tròng kính: Hổ phách/Xanh dương; Màu xanh dương; Xanh lơ; Màu xanh lá cây; Đỏ tím/Xanh lá; Đỏ/Xanh dương; Đỏ/Xanh lam; Đỏ/Xanh lá; Khác